Montana, session 2025, HB812.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 39-51-2108, MCA, is amended to read:
"39-51-2108. Payment of benefits based on services in public, charitable, or educational
organizations. (1) Benefits based on services in employment defined in 39-51-203(5) and (6) are payable in
the same amount, on the same terms, and subject to the same conditions as benefits payable on the basis of
other services subject to this chapter, except that benefits based on services in an instructional, research, or
principal administrative capacity for an educational institution may not be paid to an individual for any week of
unemployment which begins during the period between two successive academic years or during a similar
period between two regular terms, whether or not successive, or during a period of paid sabbatical leave
provided for in the individual's contract if the individual performs the services in the first of the academic years
or terms and if the individual has a contract to perform services or a reasonable assurance of performing
services in any instructional, research, or principal administrative capacity for any educational institution in the
second of the academic years or terms.
(2) (a) Benefits based on services in any other capacity for an educational institution must be
denied to any individual for any week which commences during a period between 2 successive academic years
or terms if the individual performs the services in the first of the academic years or terms and there is a
reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the services in the second of the academic years or
terms. If any individual is denied benefits and was not offered an opportunity to perform the services for the
educational institution for the second of the academic years or terms, the individual is entitled to a retroactive
payment of the benefits for each week for which the individual filed a timely claim for benefits and for which
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 812

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 812.1
benefits were denied solely by reason of the denial provided for in this section.
(b) For the purposes of this subsection (2), the term "individual" does not include nonprofessional
employees of an educational institution in compliance with 26 U.S.C. 3304(a)(6)(A)(ii)(I).
(3) Benefits based on services described in subsections (1) and (2) of this section must be denied
to any individual for any week that commences during an established and customary vacation period or holiday
recess if the individual performs the services in the period immediately before the vacation period or holiday
recess and there is reasonable assurance that the individual will perform the service in the period immediately
following the vacation period or holiday recess.
(4) Benefits based on services described in subsections (1) and (2) to an individual who performed
the services for an educational institution while in the employ of an educational service agency must be denied
as specified in subsections (1) through (3). The term "educational service agency" means a governmental
agency or governmental entity which is established and operated exclusively for the purpose of providing the
service to one or more educational institutions."
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 812